District of Columbia statutes.
1-509

Allowances for privately owned vehicles for employees.

The Mayor may establish rates and reimburse employees, by regulation, for privately owned automobiles and motorcycles used for the performance of official duties. The rates established by the Mayor shall not exceed the maximum prevailing rates for such vehicles as prescribed in the Federal Property Management Regulations 101-7 (Federal Travel Regulations). The proposed regulations shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3202, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3202 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 3202 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
1981 Ed., § 1-518.